Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 5 Armories and Other Facilities

38-2-190.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Armory” means any building, buildings, aircraft hangars, offices, quarters, or other facilities and real property provided for and devoted to the training and housing of the organized militia.

“Maintenance facilities” means shops, centers, and other facilities, including storage facilities located within such maintenance facilities, except minor maintenance facilities located within the armories proper, which are utilized for the purpose of maintaining and repairing federal or state property.

“Range” means all outdoor areas including buildings and other facilities thereon owned, leased, or otherwise operated by the state for training and competition of the organized militia in weapons firing but shall not include small bore ranges installed within armories or other facilities.

“Storage facilities” means all buildings, warehouses, depots, and other facilities utilized wholly for storage of federal or state property but shall not include unit supply facilities located within armories nor storage facilities in maintenance facilities.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 69.

38-2-191.
Construction, conversion, expansion, or alteration of armories and other facilities authorized when adjutant general deems necessary.

The adjutant general, whenever he shall deem it necessary, subject to the approval of the Governor and provided funds have been appropriated and provided by the state, or by the United States, or by counties, or by municipalities in whole or jointly is authorized to construct, reconstruct, expand, convert, and alter all such facilities as defined in Code Section 38-2-190 for the use of the organized militia.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 25; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 70.

38-2-192.
Funding, equipping, and maintenance of facilities.

The equipping and maintenance of facilities defined in Code Section 38-2-190 shall be from funds appropriated and provided by the state, the United States, the counties, and municipalities, in whole or jointly, and, in the case of armories, from funds derived from rentals as set forth in Code Section 38-2-195.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 71.

38-2-193.
Military division authorized to accept and procure federal funds; adjutant general authorized to utilize funds for projects; recipient of federal funds.

The Military Division, Department of Defense is designated as the agency of the state:

To take such steps as may be necessary to develop programs for the expenditure of federal funds and to procure the allotment of such funds as may be provided by or pursuant to any act of Congress for the construction, demolition, reconstruction, improvement, equipping, furnishing, maintenance, and operation of armories, camps, ranges, bases, or any building, structure, or facility for the organized militia; and

To execute and administer such programs and to cooperate with the federal authorities responsible therefor.

The adjutant general, subject to the approval of the Governor, is authorized and empowered to negotiate for, accept, and approve projects, proposals, contracts, and agreements for the construction, reconstruction, expansion, conversion, purchase, lease, repair, rehabilitation, improvement, equipping, furnishing, maintenance, and operation, in whole or in part with federal funds, of armories, camps, ranges, bases, or any building, structure, or facility for the organized militia.

When federal funds are made available or provided to the state either directly or by way of reimbursement for any moneys expended by the state for the construction, demolition, reconstruction, expansion, conversion, purchase, lease, repair, rehabilitation, improvement, equipping, furnishing, maintenance, and operation of any armory, camp, range, base, building, structure, or facility for the organized militia, the adjutant general is authorized to receive such funds on behalf of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 72.

38-2-194.
Control of armories and other facilities; officer in charge.

All armories and other facilities defined in Code Section 38-2-190 owned, leased, or maintained by the state or by the United States for use of the organized militia and all activities conducted therein shall be under the general charge and control of the adjutant general. Unless otherwise designated by the adjutant general, the unit commander shall be the officer in charge of the armory and other facilities occupied by his unit; provided, however, that, where two or more units occupy the same armory or facility, the senior unit commander shall be the officer in charge. The officer in charge shall be directly responsible to the adjutant general for carrying out this part and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 73.

38-2-195.
Use of armories and other facilities.

Armories and other facilities which are owned, leased, and operated by the state will not be used at any time by others when the use will interfere in any way with the functions and training of the organized militia unit or units occupying the same.

The use of armories and other facilities shall be in accordance with regulations issued pursuant to this part.

Armories and other facilities of the organized militia shall not be used for political or religious purposes, except that an armory may be used for the purpose of holding the national or state convention of a political party with the prior approval of the adjutant general.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 74.

Cross references.

Registration and organization of political parties and bodies generally, §

21-2-110

.